Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6306.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, Daniel Vaca
may join Kaley Erin O’Connor and James John Pawelski in marriage within the City of Newport,
Rhode Island, on or about October 12, 2025. Daniel Vaca is hereby authorized and empowered to
join the foregoing persons in marriage pursuant to and in accordance with Chapter 3 of Title 15 of
the General Laws, entitled “Solemnization of Marriages.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002861
========